lexicon_md1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +N      ! Noun tag
        +Sg     ! Singular
        +Pl     ! Plural
        +Nom
        +Gen
        +Dat
        +Acc
        +Loc

!Define root lexicon
LEXICON Root
  Nouns ; ! No input, no output

!Define noun lexicon
LEXICON Nouns
!5. deklinācija:
meiten N5dekl ;
kurp N5dekl ;
!3. deklinācija:
tirg N3dekl ;
vid N3dekl ;
!6. deklinācija:
nakt N6dekl ;
valsts N6dekl ;

! Define 3rd declension paradigm
LEXICON N3dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^us # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^us # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^um # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ū # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

! Define 5th declension paradigm
LEXICON N5dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^e # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs # ;

! Define 6th declension paradigm
LEXICON N6dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^s # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ij # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^is # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^īm # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^is # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^īs # ;
